Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1239 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, the term "invasive woody species"
means a tree or shrub species that is rapidly encroaching into
adjoining lands and is likely to cause harm to the environment or
economy. Invasive woody species include, but are not limited to,
Juniperus virginiana (Eastern Redcedar), Juniperus scopulorum (Rocky
Mountain juniper), Juniperus monosperma (oneseed juniper) and
Tamarix ramosissima (salt cedar).
B. The Oklahoma Department of Transportation shall establish
and implement a program for the systematic identification, removal,
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1822 Page 1

and management of invasive woody species within rights-of-way under
its jurisdiction. The eradication program shall include the
following components:
1. Surveys to identify the presence and extent of invasive
woody species;
2. Development of a prioritized plan for eradication and
control;
3. Use of best management practices for removal, including
methods that minimize harm to native vegetation and prevent soil
erosion;
4. Monitoring and follow-up measures to prevent
reestablishment; and
5. Collaboration with local, state, and federal agencies, as
well as nongovernmental organizations, to leverage expertise and
resources.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.








ENGR. H. B. NO. 1822 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1822 Page 3